Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.210

Rules and regulations—Filing—Permanent register.

Each board shall file forthwith with the clerk of the court a certified copy of all rules and regulations adopted. The clerk shall keep a permanent register of such rules open to public inspection.

[ 1967 c 189 s 21.]